Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.527.020

Bond proceeds—Use.

This chapter is not intended to limit the legislature's ability to appropriate bond proceeds if the full amount authorized in this chapter has not been appropriated after one biennia.

[ 2023 c 473 s 203; 2008 c 179 s 203.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 473: See note following RCW 43.100A.321.